Texas, session 892, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 418.083, Government Code, as added by H.B. 3010, Acts of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, and effective September 1, 2025, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 418.083.  ELIGIBILITY FOR GRANT. A political subdivision is eligible to apply to the division for a grant under this subchapter if the political subdivision is: (1)  a county: (A)  that: (i)  has a population of less than 100,000; (ii)  has a gross domestic product of less than $3 billion [$2 billion]; (iii)  has a poverty rate greater than 10 [15] percent; and (iv)  is located wholly or partly in a disaster area; and (B)  for which the total dollar amount of damages resulting from the disaster, as shown in an assessment of damages prepared after the disaster, exceeds the amount equal to 10 percent of the state and local sales and use taxes collected in the county during the state fiscal year preceding the year in which the disaster occurs; or (2)  a political subdivision other than a county that is wholly or partly located in a county described by Subdivision (1). SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.